lib/dict/hyph_cs_CZ.dic
pøe3h
pøe3j
pøe3t4
pøe3z
pøe3è2
pøi3
pøih4
2p¹
p¹4ti
2p»
qu2
2r.
1ra.
ra4br
ra4em
ra4es
ra4ff
ra4hl
ra4hm
ra4jg
ra4j¹
2rak
ra4nh
ra3si
rast4r
ra4vv
ra4wl
ra4y.
ra4yo
ra4ïm
4ra¾i
r1b
r2bl
r1c
rca3
r3cha
r3cho
rc4ki
r1d
r4dla
rdo2s
re4ad
re4au
red4r
re4et
re3kl
re3kvi
re4mr
re2sb
res3l
retis4
ret4r
re4um
r1ha
r3hl.
rh3n
r1ho
r3hu
r1há
ri4bb
1ric
ric4ku
ri4dg
ri4dr
ri4fl
ri4gh
ri4zm
2rk
r2kl
r1l
2r1m
r4mio
2rn
rna4v¹
rn4dr
ro4ad
ro3by
rod2l
ro3d4r
3rofy
ro3h
ro4h.
ro4jb
ro4k¹
rom3n
romy4s
ropát4
ro2sb
ro4skv
ro4sky
ro3sv
ro3ti
ro3tl
ro4tè
ro3vd
rovì4t
3rový
roz3d
roz3n
ro4zo
roz3v
ro3zá
ro4èp
rpa3d
2rr
rr4ha
rr4ho
2r1s
r2st
r4stu
rs3tvì
rs3tvý
2r1t
r2th
r4trá
rt4sm
rtu3
r2t3v
rt4zu
1ru.
ru3se
ru3si
rus3k
ru3¾i
3rvaní
r1x
1ry.
rych3
ryd2
rys3ky
rys3t
ry4zk
ry4zn
ry4í.
ry4¹k
2rz
rz3d
rz3l
rád4l
rá4d¾
1rák
rá3ri
1ráø
r1è
4rèitý.
rè3t
3ré.
2ró
2r¹
r¹4ní
rù4m.
rùs3ta
rù4v.
3rý.
rý4zn
2s.
sa4pf
sa4pr
sas3k
s2b2
s2c
s3ca
s3ce.
sch2
sch4l
sch4n
3schop
s3ci
sci4e
s3cí
s2d
1se
se4au
se3h
se4ig
se4il
sej4m
se4ku
3sel
se3lh
3sem
ser4va
se3s2
ses4k
se4ss
se4stra
se4stru
se4stø
set2
se3tk
se3tø
se4ur
se3z
se3èt
2sf
s3fo
3sfé
s3fú
1si
3sic
3sif
si4fl
sig4no
3sik
si3ste
3sit
s2j
s3ju
s2k
4skac
s4kak
4skam
s4kok
2skon
skos4
4skot
sk4ra
sk4ru
sk4ry
4skve
sk4vo
s3kán
s3kù
3sl.
4s3la.
s4lav
s3le.
s4led
s3lem
s3len
s3let
s4lib
s4lièi
3sln
4s3lo.
s2ly
s3ly.
s1lí
s2ma
s4mek
s2mo
2sn
s2na
s3nat
s2ne
s3ne.
sn4tl
s2ná
s3ná.
s4níd
1so
sob4l
so3br
so4sk
so4tv
sou3h
sou3s
souz4
so4¹k
s2p
s4pol
spro4s
1sr
2ss
ss4sr
2st.
4sta.
s3taj
s2tan
st4at
4stec
s4tep
st4er
s4tero
s4tich
2stil
s4tink
4stit.
4stiè
st3lo
2stn
4sto.
s4tona
4stou.
4str.
4stram
s4trik
4strn
4strác
4stupni
s2tv
st4ve
3ství
4sty.
s4tyl
3sty¹
s2tá
4stá.
s3táø
4stì.
s4tìd
3stìh
s2tìr
s2tì¾
s1tí
2stí.
s3tøej
1su
su4ba
su4bo
suma4
su3ve
s2v
sy3c
sych3r
sy4nes
sá2d
3sáh
sá2kl
2s2è
s3èi
1sé
1sí
2sò
2s»
s3»o
1sù
s2¾
2t.
1ta.
ta2bl
tac4tvo
t2a3d
1taj
ta4jf
ta4jg
4talt
4tand
3tanì
t1ao
2tark
tast4
ta3str
ta4èk
2t1b
2t1c
1te
3te.
te4ak
te4fl
te4in
4teném
teob4
tep3l
ters4
tes3ta
te4tr
te4uc
te4ur
te4ut
2tf
2tg
1ti
ti4gr
2tih
ti3kl
tin4g
ti4pl
ti3sl
tis4tr
ti4tr
2titu
tiz4r
4tizí
tiú3
2ti¾
2tk2
t4kal
4t2kan
t4kat
t2kl
tk4la
tk4li
4tknì
t2ká
2tl
3tl.
4tla.
t1le
tles3
3tlm
t3lo.
t4lou
tlu3
tlu4s
t1ly
t1lé
2tm
t2ma
2tn
t3ní
1to
to4as
to3b
tob4l
to3dr
to4hm
to4ir
2toj
tol4s
to4ol
4top.
4topt
4topu
2torn
2toup
2tp
t3rant
t4rea
t4ref
tre4t
4tric.
trip4
t4rit
t4rog
t3rol
tro4sk
t4rou
4trouh
4troò.
4trun
t4rus
4t4ru¾
t3ráln
4trá¹
2trè
t3rùm
t3rùv
2trý
2t1s
ts4ko
ts2t
2t1t
tt4ch
tt4ri
1tu.
tu4ff
1tuj
tu4lk
2tup
tu4r.
tu3ry
tu4s.
tu4».
tu3¾i
t2v
2tve
2t3vi
t4vinn
t4vi¹
t4výc
1ty.
ty4gø
ty2la
ty4øe
ty4øh
ty4øj
ty4øo
ty4ør
ty4øú
3tá.
tá4fl
t2è
t3èi
2tèí
1té
té2bl
3tém
1tì
tì3d4l
2tìh
2tìnn
2tìp
1tíc
4tíc.
4tíce
1tím
2tín
2tír
2tø
t4øeb
tøeh3n
t2øel
t2øic
t3øil
tø4ti
t1øu
t2øá
3tøáb
tøí4s
2t¹
t3¹t
t¹4ti
1tù
1tý.
1tým
1týø
3tý¹
u1
2u.
u2at
u2b
u3ba
u3be
u3bi
u3bo
ubs4t
u3bu
u3bá
u3bí.
u3bù
uc4tí
2u2d
u3de
u3di
u3do
u3dru
u3du
u3dy
u3dí
ue4fa
2uf
u2hl
uh3lá
uh3no
u2in
u2jm
u2k
u3ka.
uk4aj
uk4al
uk4at
u3ke
uk3la
uk3le
u3ko
u3ku
u3ky
uk4á.
u3kù
ul4fa
ul1h
ul4pí
u2m
u3ma
u3me
u3mi
um4pl
um4ru
u3mu
u3má
3umø
u2n
un4dl
u3ne
u3no
u3nu
u3nì
u3ní
u3nù
un4¾r
u2p
u3pa
u3pe
upe2r3
u3pi
u3pln
u3pu
u3py
u3pá
u3pì
u3pí
u3pù
u2r
u3ra
u3re
u3ri
2u3ro
u3ru
u3ry.
u3rá
1urè
u3rù
u2s
us3ky
us3ká
us3ké
us3ký
us1l
us2lo
u3so
u4ste
u4sty
u4sté
u4stì
u3stø
u4st¹
u4stý
u3su.
u3sy
u3sá
u3sí
u3sù
u4tro
u4trá
u2v
u3vi
u3vu
u2z
u3ze
u3zi
uz1l
u3zo
u3zu
u3zí
u2è
u3èa
u3èe
u3èi
u3èo
uè3t
u3èu
u3èá
u3èí
u2ï
u2ò
u2¹
u3¹e
u3¹i
u¹4kl
u3¹o
u¹3tí
u3¹u
u3¹á
u3¹í
u2¾
u3¾e
u3¾o
u3¾u
u3¾á
u3¾í
1v
2v.
va3dl
va4j»
va4kl
2v1b
2v1c
v2ch
2v2d
v4dal
v3di
v4dìk
v4dìè
ve3dle
ve3jd
3ven
ve2p
ve3ps
vep3ø
ves3l
ve4sm
ves4p
ve3sta
ve3t4ø
ve2z3m
vi4ch
vide2
vi4dr
vi4et
vi4kr
vi2tr
2vk
v2kr
v2l
2v3la.
4vle.
4vlem
2vlo
2vm
2vn
v4nad
vo3b
vo4ic
vo4ja
vo4jb
vo4jd
vo4jj
vo4jm
vo4jø
vo2s
vo4tø
vou3
vous2
v2p
vr2c
vr2dl
4vrny
v1ro
vr4st
vrst3v
vrs4tvì
2vs2
v1sk
v3stv
2v2t
vy3c
vy3d2
vy4dra
vyp2
vy3s2
vy4sn
vys4t
vy3t
vy3è
vyè4k
vy¹2
vy4¹.
vy4¹m
vy4¹¹
vy4¾l
v2z2
vz4no
vz4né
vz4nì
vz4ní
vá3ri
2v2è
v3èá
v3èí
v4èír
vì4cm
vì3t4a
více3
ví4hat
3vín
2vò
2vøí
v3øín
v2¹2
v¹e3s
v3¹tí.
3výs
vý3t
3vý3z
v2¾2
wa4fd
3war
wa4re
we2
2x.
xand4
2xf
xisk4
2xn
3xov
x1t
xt4ra
xy4sm
y1
y2a
y2bl
yb3ri
y2ch
y4chr
y2d1l
yd4lá
y2dr
yd4y.
y2e
y2gr
y3hn
yh4ne
yj4ma
yj4me
y2kl
yk3la
y3klop
yk4ly
ymané4
ym4kl
yna4s
y3ni
ype4r
yp4si
yp4tá
y2pø
yr2v
y2s
y3sa
y3se
y3si
ys3lu
y3sm
y3so
y3sp
ys2t
ys3te
yst4r
y3su
y3sv
y3sy
y3sá
y3sé
y3sí
yt4me
yu3¾
y3vs
yvì4t
y3zb
y3zd
y3zk
y3zn
yz4nì
yz4ní
y3zp
yz4po
yè2k
y2ò
yø3b
yøk4n
yø4èe
y3øí
y2¹
y3¹e
y3¹i
y3¹k
y¹1l
y3¹o
y3¹p
y3¹u
y3¹í
y¾2
y3¾d
1z
2z.
zab2l
za4bs
za4dk
za3dl
za4dn
za3h
za3i
za3j
za4jk
za3k
za4kt
zal4k
zam4n
za3p2
za3s2
zat2
za3tl
zat4r
za4ut
za3z
zaz4n
za4z¹
za4è.
za3¹
za¹4k
za4¹s
2zb
zban4
z2by
zbys4
2z1c
2z2d
z3di
zdnì4ní
z4doba
z4dobný
zd4re
zd4ví
z2e
ze3h
ze3p2
4zerot
ze3s2
zes4p
zet2
zev2
ze3vn
ze3z
ze4z.
2z2f
z1há
z4ine
z2j
z3jí
2z2k
z3ka.
z3ky
z3ké
z3kù
z3ký
2zl
3zl.
zlhos4
zlik3
z3ly.
z2m2
2zme
z3mn
z3my
z4mìn
2z2n
3znak
z4nal
z3ne.
z3nic
z3no
z3nu
z3ny
z3né
z3nì
z4nìl
z3ní
z4nít
z4nív
z3ný
zo4tr
zo4¹k
2z2p
z3pt
z4pát
3zrak
2z1s2
2zt
ztros3
z4trá
z3tø
3zu.
zu3mo
zu3mì
zu3mí
zu3¹
z2v
zva4d
z3vaø
z3vi
zvik4
zv4nì
z3vod
z3voj
z4von
zv4ro
z4ván
z4vìs
z3víj
3zy.
2zz
zá1
záh2
zá4kl.
3záp
zá3s2
zá3z
zá¹2
2zè
z3èl
2zò
z2ø
zøej3
z3øez
z3øe¹
2z¹2
z3¹k
z¹4ka
z3¹t
2z2ú1
zú3è
zú3¾
zù3s
á1b
á2bl
áb4ry
á4bø.
á3cho
ác3ti3
á1d
á2dl
ádo4s
ádos4ti
ád1ø
á1ha
á3he
áh1l
á3hl.
áh3n
á1ho
á1hr
á1há
á1j
á4jmu
áj4mù
á4kli
ák4ni
á1la
á1le
á1lo
á1lu
á1ly
á3lé
á1lí
á3my
á3mé
á1mì
á3mí
á3mý
áne4v
á1ra
á1re
ár2m
á1ro
á1ru
á3rù
á1s
á2sc
á2s3k
ás4k.
ás4kl
ás4kn
á2sla
ás4ly
á2sm
ás4po
á2st
át3k
át1r
á1tu
á1ty
á1tí
á3tý
áv4si
áv4sí
áz3k
áz3ni
ázni4c
áz4vi
á2ò
á1ø
áø4ke
áø4kù
á2¹
á3¹e
á3¹í
2è.
1èa
èa4br
2èb
2è1c
1èe
3èe.
èe1c
èes3k
1èi
2èk
è3ka.
è3ko
è3ku
è3ky
2è1m
2èn
è2ne
1èo
è2p
2ès
è1sk
ès4la
ès4sr
2è2t
è4tené.
è4tený
èt4la
è4tový.
3ètv
4ètìn
è3tí
1èu
1èá
1èí
èís3l
1èù
2ï.
1ïa
1ïo
ïs4te
2ï1t
3ïuj
é1
é2d
é3di
é3do
é2f
é3fo
éf1r
é2kl
é2l
é2m
é3ma
é3me
é3mi
é3mo
é3mu
é3mù
4ére.
é2s
é2t
é3ta
é3to
é3tá
é2¹
é2¾
ì1c
ìd3r
ì3ha
ì3he
ì3hl.
ìh3lo
ìh3n
ì1ho
ì3hu
ì3hù
ì3ja
ì1je
ì1jo
ì3jù
ì4klé
ì3k2t
ì1l
ì1ra
ìra3d
ì1re
ì1ro
ìr3s
ìrs4t
ì1ru
ì1ry
ì1rù
ìs3k
ìs3n
ìt1a3
ìt4ac
ìt1l
ì1tr
ìt3ra
ì4traj
ìt3v
ì1tí
ìt3øí
ì2v
ì3va
ì3ve
ì3vl
ì3vo
ì3vu
ì3vá
ìv3è
ì2z
ì3ze
ì3zi
ìz3n
ì3zo
ì3zí
ì1ø
ì2¹
ì3¹e
ì3¹i
ì3¹o
ì3¹u
ì3¹á
ì3¹í
ì¹3»
ì¹4»s
ì2»
ì3»o
ì2¾
ì3¾e
ì3¾i
ì3¾o
ì3¾u
ì3¾í
í1b
íb3ø
í3cho
ích4t
íd1l
í1h
í2hl
íh3n
í1j
íjed4
íj4mù
í2kr
í1l
í1má
í3mé
í1mì
í1r
í1sa
í2s3k
ís4kl
ís4kn
ís4l.
ís3le
ís4ln
ísáh2
í1t
ít3k
í3t3øe
íz3da
íz3de
íz3k
í3zna
í3z3ni
í3znìn
í2ò
í1ø
í2¹
í3¹e
í3¹i
í3¹o
í3¹í
1ò
2ò.
2òa
òa3d
2òk
2òm
3òov
ò1s
2ò1t
ó1
ó2z
ó3za
ó3zi
ó3zo
ó3zy
2ø.
øa4pl
øa4ïm
2ø2b
2øc
2ød
øe3ch
øe4dob
øe1h
øe3jd
øe3kl
øe3kv
øe4køí
øeo4r
øe3p2
øe4p.
øe4pk
øe4pè
øer4v
2øes
øe3ska
øe3sko
øe2sp
øes3po
øe4sr
øe3sta
øe3stu
øe3stá
øe3stø
øe3tl
øet4ø
øe3zd
øe3zk
4øezl
øe3èt
øi1
øia3
øi3h
øi4h.
øi4hn
øi4jï
øi4l.
øi4lb
øil2n
4øine
øis2
3øi4t.
øi4v.
øi4vk
øi4vn
øi3z
øiè4t
øi3ø
øi4¹.
2øk
ø2kl
øk4la
øk4li
øk4ly
øk4no
2ø1l
2ø1m
2øn
1øo
2øou
2ø2p
2ø1s
øs4to
2ø1t
ø2v
2øz
øá4pl
øá2sl
2ø1è
2øíd
øí4kø
øí1s
2ø¹
ø3¹t
ø¹4ti
1¹
2¹.
¹ab3
¹a4vl
2¹1c
¹ej4d
¹ep3t
¹i4mr
2¹2k
¹3ka
¹3ke
¹3k3li
4¹3kou
4¹kov
3¹kr
¹k4ro
¹3ku.
¹3ky
2¹l
¹2la
¹2li
¹3liv
¹2lo
¹lá2
¹2lé
¹2lý
2¹1m
¹mi4d
2¹n
¹2p
2¹1s
2¹t
¹4tip
¹t4ka
¹t4kl
¹4tìk
¹2tìs
¹4tìv
¹4típ
¹2v
¹í3d
¹2ò
¹3¹í
2¹2»
¹3»o
¹3»u
¹3»á
1»
2».
3»al
2»k
2»m
2»t
»áè4k
1ú
ú2c2
ú2d
új4ma
ú2k
ú2l
ú2n
ú2p
ú2t
út4ko
ú2v
ú2z
úz3k
ú2è
3úèe
úøe4z
ú¹4ti
ú2¾
ù1b
ù1c
ù1hl
ù3jd
ù4jmový
ù1le
ù1my
ù1mì
ù1ra
ùr4va
ùr4vy
ù1s2
ù2st
ùs3te
ùs3tán
ùt2
ù3tkl
ù2v
ù3va
ù3vo
ù3vì
ù2z
ù3zo
ù2¾
ù3¾e
ù3¾i
ù3¾o
ý1b
ý3cho
ý1d
ýd4la
ý1h
ý1j
ý1l
ý1ml
ý1mì
ý2n
ý3no
ýpo3è4
ý1r
ý1s2
ý2sk
ý1t
ýt4ku
ýt4ky
ý1u
ý4vli
ý3zk
ý3zn
ý4zvu
ýè4nì
ý1ø
ý¹3l
1¾
2¾.
¾a3d
¾a4tv
3¾aè
2¾1b
2¾1c
2¾1d
¾e2b3
¾eh3n
¾e4ml
¾e4zg
¾i4dl
¾i4jm
3¾il
¾i2vl
2¾k
¾k4ni
2¾l
¾4lic
3¾lo
2¾1m
2¾n
¾on2
2¾1s2
2¾1t
¾2v
¾á4br
¾á4nr
2¾ï
¾í4zn
2¾ò
2¾¹
¾¹4ti
¾¹4tì
